Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7790.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-24-31 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-24 entitled "Lighting
Equipment and Reflectors" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-24-31. Flashing lights — Forward viewing or rotary beam lights.
(a) Flashing lights are prohibited, except on an authorized emergency vehicle, school bus,
snow-removal equipment, or on any vehicle as a means for indicating a right or left turn. However,
the requirements of § 31-24-33 shall be deemed to be satisfied if the vehicle is equipped with lamps
at the front mounted at the same level, displaying simultaneously flashing white or amber lights,
and at the rear mounted at the same level, and displaying simultaneously flashing red lights, all of
which lights shall be visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet (500′).
(b) Forward viewing or rotating beam lights may be installed on and shall be restricted to
the following categories of vehicles, and these lights shall be of color designated:
(1) Emergency response vehicles of any fire, rescue, or ambulance department, fire chiefs,
assistant fire chiefs, deputy chiefs, captains; any privately owned vehicle of any authorized
volunteer member of a fire, rescue, or ambulance department; emergency management agency
directors, assistant directors, assistant medical examiners and/or forensic pathologists of the office
of state medical examiners; rescue vehicles, emergency response vehicles of the department of
environmental management and the office of the state fire marshal; vehicles owned by the Rhode
Island Disaster Medical Assistance Team, Inc.; school buses; hospital emergency response

vehicles; and two (2) American Red Cross disaster vehicles: Red, white and/or alternating flashing
white;
(2) Wrecker trucks, service station trucks, state and town safety and maintenance vehicles;
snowplows and tractors; light company trucks, telephone company trucks, water company trucks,
oil company trucks, and other utilities’ trucks; vehicles of television, radio and press photographers;
newspaper motor route carriers; rural mail carriers; all motor-propelled vehicles owned by the
Northern Rhode Island REACT (radio emergency associated citizens team); all motor-propelled
vehicles owned by or under contract to the Rhode Island department of transportation when on
official state business; and vehicles marking the beginning and end of funeral processions: Amber,
provided, however, that wrecker and transportation vehicles operated pursuant to a public utilities
commission license, and roadside assistance vehicles of any type operated for that purpose by the
American Automobile Association shall be permitted to use flashing amber lights at the front and
rear of the vehicle, to be activated only in the course of providing assistance to or transportation for
a disabled vehicle. A fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) shall be charged for the issuance of a flashing
lights permit to every vehicle identified in this subsection, with the exception of flashing lights
permits issued to state, town or fire district safety and maintenance vehicles, which shall not be
charged a fee.
(3) Police units, state and local: Center rotating beam lights: Blue or red; Outboard mounted
lights: Blue or red.
(4) Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in § 31-41.1-4.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003583
========
LC003583 - Page 2 of 3